Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2235
Act, how cited.

Sections 54-2235 to 54-22,100 shall be known and may be cited as the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 574, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2201;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 965, § 1.